hr-HR: Integracija oružnog sustava: Lanser ATGM; Integrirana strojnica; Sustav nosača minobacača; Nema; Daljinski upravljiva oružana stanica (RWS); Lanseri dimnih bombi; Top u kupoli; Samo nosač oružja; Ostalo
cs: Integrace zbraňového systému: Odpalovací zařízení ATGM; Integrovaný kulomet; Nosič minometu; Žádná; Dálkově ovládaná zbraňová stanice (RWS); Vrháče kouřových granátů; Věžový kanón; Pouze lafeta; Jiná
ko: 무기 시스템 통합: ATGM 런처; 기관총 통합형; 박격포 탑재 시스템; 없음; 원격 무장 장치(RWS); 연막탄 발사기; 포탑 장착형 캐논; 무기 마운트 전용; 기타
nb: Integrasjon av våpensystem: Panservernrakettsystem; Integrert maskingevær; Bombekastersystem; Ingen; Fjernstyrt våpenstasjon (RWS); Røykgranatkastere; Kanontårn; Kun våpenfeste; Annet
zh-TW: 武器系統整合: 反戰車飛彈發射器; 整合式機槍; 迫擊砲搭載系統; 無; 遙控武器站 (RWS); 煙霧彈發射器; 砲塔式火砲; 僅武器掛架; 其他
fr: Intégration des systèmes d'armes: Lanceur ATGM; Mitrailleuse intégrée; Système porte-mortier; Aucun; Tourelleau téléopéré (RWS); Lance-grenades fumigènes; Canon en tourelle; Support d’arme uniquement; Autre
sv: Integrering av vapensystem: ATGM-avskjutningsramp; Integrerad kulspruta; Granatkastarsystem; Ingen; Fjärrstyrd vapenstation (RWS); Rökkastare; Tornmonterad kanon; Endast vapenfäste; Övrigt
da: Integration af våbensystem: ATGM-raketstyr; Integreret maskingevær; Morterbæresystem; Ingen; Fjernstyret våbenstation (RWS); Røggrenatkastere; Kanon i tårn; Kun våbenmontering; Andet
it: Integrazione del sistema d'arma: Lanciatore ATGM; Mitragliatrice integrata; Sistema portamortaio; Nessuno; Stazione d'arma a controllo remoto (RWS); Lanciagranate fumogene; Cannone in torretta; Solo supporto d'arma; Altro
pt-BR: Integração dos sistemas de armas: Lançador de mísseis antitanque guiados (ATGM); Metralhadora integrada; Sistema porta-morteiro; Nenhum; Estação de armas remotas (RWS); Lançadores de granada de fumaça; Canhão em torre; Apenas suporte para arma; Outros
sl-SI: Integracija orožnega sistema: Lanser ATGM; Vgrajen mitraljez; Sistem nosilca minometa; Brez; Daljinsko vodena oborožitvena postaja (RWS); Lanserji dimnih granat; Top v kupoli; Samo nosilec za orožje; Drugo
th: การบูรณาการระบบอาวุธ: เครื่องยิง ATGM; ติดตั้งปืนกลในตัว; ระบบบรรทุกเครื่องยิงลูกระเบิด; ไม่มี; สถานีอาวุธควบคุมระยะไกล (RWS); เครื่องยิงระเบิดควัน; ปืนใหญ่แบบมีป้อม; ฐานติดตั้งอาวุธเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Integração de sistemas de armamento: Lançador de mísseis ATGM; Metralhadora integrada; Sistema porta-morteiros; Nenhum; Estação de armas remota (RWS); Lançadores de granadas de fumo; Canhão em torre; Apenas suporte para arma; Outro
tr: Silah sistemi entegrasyonu: ATGM fırlatıcı; Entegre makineli tüfek; Havan taşıyıcı sistemi; Yok; Uzaktan komutalı silah sistemi (UKSS); Sis bombası fırlatıcıları; Taretli top; Yalnızca silah kundağı; Diğer
nl: Integratie wapensysteem: ATGM-lanceerinrichting; Geïntegreerd machinegeweer; Mortierdragersysteem; Geen; Op afstand bediend wapenstation (RWS); Rookgranaatwerpers; Kanon met geschutskoepel; Alleen wapenbevestiging; Overige
hu: Fegyverrendszer-integráció: ATGM indító; Integrált géppuska; Aknavető-hordozó rendszer; Nincs; Távirányított fegyverállvány (RWS); Füstgránátvetők; Toronyba épített ágyú; Csak fegyverállvány; Egyéb
zh-CN: 武器系统集成: 反坦克导弹 (ATGM) 发射器; 机枪集成; 迫击炮运载系统; 无; 遥控武器站 (RWS); 烟雾弹发射器; 炮塔火炮; 仅武器底座; 其他
sk-SK: Integrácia zbrojného systému: Odpaľovacie zariadenie protitankových riadených striel (ATGM); Integrovaný guľomet; Nosič mínometu; Žiadna; Diaľkovo ovládaná zbraňová stanica (RWS); Vrhacie zariadenia dymových granátov; Vežový kanón; Iba držiak zbrane; Iné
es: Integración con sistema de armas: Lanzador ATGM; Ametralladora integrada; Sistema portamortero; Ninguno; Estación de armas remota (RWS); Lanzagranadas de humo; Cañón de torreta; Solo montaje de armas; Otro
ru: Интеграция оружейной системы: Пусковая установка ПТРК; Встроенный пулемет; Самоходный миномет; Нет; Дистанционно управляемый боевой модуль (ДУБМ); Гранатометы для постановки дымовых завес; Башенное орудие; Только установка для оружия; Другое
fi: Asejärjestelmän integrointi: Panssarintorjuntaohjuksen laukaisin; Integroitu konekivääri; Kranaatinheittimen kuljetusjärjestelmä; Ei mitään; Etäkäytettävä asejärjestelmä (RWS); Savukranaatinheittimet; Tornillinen tykki; Vain aseen kiinnitys; Muu
bg-BG: Интеграция на оръжейна система: Пускова установка за ПТУР; Вградена картечница; Система за носене на минохвъргачка; Няма; Дистанционно управляем оръжеен модул (RWS); Пускови установки за димни гранати; Куполно оръдие; Само стойка за оръжие; Други
ro-RO: Integrare a sistemului de arme: Lansator ATGM; Mitralieră integrată; Sistem de transport mortier; Fără; Stație de arme controlată de la distanță (RWS); Lansatoare de grenade fumigene; Tun în turelă; Doar suport pentru arme; Altele
vi: Khả năng tích hợp hệ thống vũ khí: Bệ phóng ATGM; Tích hợp súng máy; Hệ thống mang súng cối; Không có; Trạm vũ khí điều khiển từ xa (RWS); Bệ phóng lựu đạn khói; Pháo trên tháp pháo; Chỉ có bệ gắn vũ khí; Khác
de: Waffensystemintegration: ATGM-Werfer; Maschinengewehr integriert; Mörserträgersystem; Keine; Fernbedienbare Waffenstation (RWS); Nebelmittelwurfanlage; Turmkanone; Nur Waffenhalterung; Sonstige
ja: 武器システム統合: ATGMランチャー; マシンガン統合; 迫撃砲運搬システム; なし; リモートウェポンステーション (RWS); 発煙弾ランチャー; 砲塔付きキャノン; 武器マウントのみ; その他
el: Ενσωμάτωση συστήματος όπλων: Εκτοξευτής ATGM; Ενσωματωμένο πολυβόλο; Σύστημα μεταφοράς όλμου; Κανένα; Τηλεχειριζόμενος σταθμός οπλισμού (RWS); Εκτοξευτές χειροβομβίδων καπνού; Κανόνι σε πυργίσκο; Μόνο βάση οπλισμού; Άλλο
lt-LT: Ginklų sistemos integravimas: PTVR paleidimo įrenginys; Integruotas kulkosvaidis; Minosvaidžio sistema; Nėra; Nuotolinio valdymo ginklų modulis (RWS); Dūminių granatų paleidimo įrenginiai; Bokštelio patranka; Tik ginklo laikiklis; Kita
pl: Integracja z systemem broni: Wyrzutnia ppk (ATGM); Zintegrowany karabin maszynowy; System moździerzowy; Brak; Zdalnie sterowany moduł uzbrojenia (ZSMU); Wyrzutnie granatów dymnych; Działo wieżowe; Tylko mocowanie uzbrojenia; Inne
en: Weapon system integration: ATGM launcher; Machine gun integrated; Mortar carrier system; None; Remote weapon station (RWS); Smoke grenade launchers; Turreted cannon; Weapon mount only; Other